Texas, session 892, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The heading to Section 253.034, Election Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 253.034.  RESTRICTIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS DURING AND FOLLOWING [REGULAR] LEGISLATIVE SESSION. SECTION 2.  Section 253.034, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-1) and amending Subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: (a-1)  This subsection applies only to a special legislative session that begins before September 1 in an odd-numbered year. During the period beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date of final adjournment of the special legislative session, a person may not knowingly make a political contribution to: (1)  a statewide officeholder; (2)  a member of the legislature; or (3)  a specific-purpose committee for supporting, opposing, or assisting a statewide officeholder or member of the legislature. (b)  A statewide officeholder, a member of the legislature, or a specific-purpose committee for supporting, opposing, or assisting a statewide officeholder or member of the legislature may not knowingly accept a political contribution, and shall refuse a political contribution that is received, during an applicable [the] period prescribed by Subsection (a) or (a-1). A political contribution that is received and refused during that period shall be returned to the contributor not later than the 30th day after the date of receipt. A contribution made by United States mail or by common or contract carrier is not considered received during that period if it was properly addressed and placed with postage or carrier charges prepaid or prearranged in the mail or delivered to the contract carrier before the beginning of the period. The date indicated by the post office cancellation mark or the common or contract carrier documents is considered to be the date the contribution was placed in the mail or delivered to the common or contract carrier unless proven otherwise. (c)  This section does not apply to a political contribution that was made and accepted with the intent that it be used: (1)  in an election held or ordered during a [the] period prescribed by Subsection (a) or (a-1) in which the person accepting the contribution is a candidate if the contribution was made after the person appointed a campaign treasurer with the appropriate authority and before the person was sworn in for that office; (2)  to defray expenses incurred in connection with an election contest; or (3)  by a person who holds a state office or a member of the legislature if the person or member was defeated at the general election held immediately before the session is convened or by a specific-purpose political committee that supports or assists only that person or member. SECTION 3.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a political contribution made on or after the effective date of this Act.  A political contribution made before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the contribution was made, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.